Illinois, session 104th, SB2124.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Let 5America Read Act. 6    Section 5. Definition. As used in this Act, "final 7decision maker" means a school board of any school district in 8the State, including special charter districts and a district 9organized under Article 34 of the School Code. 10    Section 10. Grievance procedure for challenges to 11instructional material. 12    (a) Within 90 days after the completion of emergency rules 13by the State Board of Education, the State Board of Education, 14with oversight over the instructional materials, including 15print, digital, online, and remote-learning resources used in 16public schools, shall create a grievance procedure for 17challenges to instructional materials that complies with this 18Act.19    (b) The grievance procedure shall permit a currently 20enrolled student, parent or guardian who permanently resides 21in the school district where the parent's or guardian's child 22or student attends, or teacher or administrator who is   SB2124- 2 -LRB104 09790 LNS 19856 b1currently employed or under contract with the school district 2to challenge instructional materials using a form that follows 3the Formal Grievance of Instructional Materials Form provided 4for in Section 25. If the child or student is under a shared 5parenting agreement, then each parent shall be permitted to 6avail themselves of the formal grievance procedure regardless 7of where each parent permanently resides.8    (c) The Review Committee, as outlined in Section 15, shall 9first attempt to resolve complaints without resorting to the 10formal grievance procedure. A student, parent or guardian, or 11teacher filing a complaint under this policy may forego any 12informal suggestions or attempts to resolve it and may proceed 13directly to the formal grievance procedure. Instructional 14materials shall not be removed from the classroom unless the 15formal grievance procedure is followed.16    (d) For all challenges, the Review Committee shall address 17the complaint promptly and equitably in accordance with the 18timeline outlined in Section 30.19    (e) A currently enrolled student, parent or guardian who 20permanently resides in the school district where the parent's 21or guardian's child or student attends, or teacher or 22administrator who is currently employed or under contract with 23the school district who wishes to avail themselves of the 24formal grievance procedure may do so by filing a complaint 25using a Formal Grievance of Instructional Materials Form 26required by Section 20.  SB2124- 3 -LRB104 09790 LNS 19856 b1    (f) The challenged instructional material shall remain 2accessible in the classroom pending a final determination 3through the formal grievance procedure.4    (g) The Review Committee shall hold a minimum of 2 public 5meetings during a school year to review complaints, welcome 6input from the public, and generate recommendations to the 7final decision maker. It is recommended that meetings shall be 8set around the time of teacher workdays, in service, or 9curriculum planning. The Review Committee may schedule more 10meetings, public or private, if a simple majority of Review 11Committee members deem it necessary to allow for additional 12time to review challenged instructional material.13    (h) For all formal grievances, the Review Committee shall 14review the challenged material using the criteria provided in 15Section 25. Upon reviewing the challenged instructional 16material, the Review Committee shall make a recommendation to 17the final decision maker.18    (i) The final decision maker shall send notice to the 19Review Committee of the final decision maker's decision to 20follow the recommendation of the Review Committee, deny to 21follow the recommendation, or modify the recommendation.22    (j) If the final decision maker dissents from the Review 23Committee's recommendation, then the Review Committee may hold 24a vote to override the final decision maker's decision. This 25vote must be by two-thirds of Review Committee members to 26override.  SB2124- 4 -LRB104 09790 LNS 19856 b1    (k) Once a final determination is reached through this 2policy regarding the instructional material, the school 3district shall notify the complainant of the final 4determination through the contact information provided on the 5Formal Grievance Procedure for Instructional Materials Form. 6The school district shall post the final determination on the 7school's website.8    (l) If the challenged instructional material faces a 9successful objection, then the removal of the instructional 10material takes effect the school year after the year in which 11the final decision was issued on the instructional material by 12the final decision maker.13    (m) When an instructional material is formally challenged 14and a final determination is reached, the review committee is 15prohibited from reviewing the same material, including newer 16editions of the same title, more than once in 3 school years.17    (n) If the challenger moves from the school district prior 18to the year the instructional material is set to be removed 19from the classroom, then the challenge shall be considered 20void. The instructional material shall remain in the classroom 21under this scenario. 22    Section 15. Review Committee composition.23    (a) A school district shall designate a Review Committee 24to review all challenges to instructional materials. The 25Review Committee shall consist of the following members:  SB2124- 5 -LRB104 09790 LNS 19856 b1        (1) at least one librarian;2        (2) several teachers;3        (3) at least one school or district-level 4    administrator;5        (4) trained students; and6        (5) community members.7    (b) The number of community members on the Review 8Committee shall not outnumber the individuals provided in 9paragraphs (1) through (4). 10    Section 20. Criteria for the Review Committee to evaluate 11formal challenges to instructional material. For each formal 12challenge, the Review Committee shall review the instructional 13material with the use of clear, objective review criteria 14created by the State Board of Education, including:15        (1) the accuracy and completeness of the instructional 16    material;17        (2) the instructional material's importance to 18    curriculum;19        (3) the reviews, awards, and recommendations by 20    educational experts relating to the instructional 21    material;22        (4) whether the instructional material is age 23    appropriate;24        (5) refers to if students have relevant age, maturity, 25    and literacy skills to comprehend the instructional   SB2124- 6 -LRB104 09790 LNS 19856 b1    material's message;2        (6) the criteria should state that the presence of 3    specific content, such as sexuality or violence, does not 4    in itself render a book inappropriate;5        (7) whether the instructional material is popular 6    among students;7        (8) the length of time material has been in use; and8        (9) whether there is a presence of timely 9    sociopolitical issues. 10    Section 25. Requirements of the Formal Grievance Procedure 11for Instructional Materials Form.12    (a) The school district shall create a Formal Grievance 13Procedure for Instructional Materials Form that complies with 14the requirements of this Section.15    (b) The Formal Grievance Procedure for Instructional 16Materials Form shall include space for a complainant to:17        (1) identify themselves as the complainant and their 18    relation to the school district, such as a parent or 19    teacher;20        (2) provide contact information, including email, 21    phone number, and address;22        (3) describe the complainant's objection to the 23    instructional material and the pages where the objection 24    occur;25        (4) establish familiarity with the work as a whole.   SB2124- 7 -LRB104 09790 LNS 19856 b1    The complainant should have read the instructional 2    material in its entirety and be able to identify 3    objectionable portions in context;4        (5) explain why the complainant considers the work 5    inappropriate, taking into consideration the teacher's 6    justification for using it; and7        (6) offer a suggestion for alternative material that 8    is of comparable educational quality. This is intended to 9    help the Review Committee assess the complainants' 10    judgment and motives. 11    Section 30. Timeline for challenges to instructional 12material.13    (a) For all challenges, the Review Committee shall address 14the complaint promptly and equitably in accordance with this 15Section.16    (b) Upon receipt of a formal complaint, the Review 17Committee shall hold a minimum of 2 public meetings during a 18school year to review complaints, welcome input from the 19public, and generate recommendations to the final decision 20maker.21    (c) The challenged instructional material shall remain 22accessible in the classroom pending a final determination 23through the formal grievance procedure.24    (d) If the challenged instructional material faces a 25successful objection, then the removal of the instructional   SB2124- 8 -LRB104 09790 LNS 19856 b1material takes effect the school year after the year in which 2the complaint was filed.3    (e) If instructional material is formally challenged and a 4final determination is reached, the instructional material 5shall not be challenged and reviewed by the Review Committee 6for 3 school years. 7    Section 35. Rulemaking authority. The State Board of 8Education shall adopt rules necessary to establish and 9implement this Act through the use of emergency rulemaking in 10accordance with Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative 11Procedure Act. The State Board of Education shall create 12clear, objective review criteria that complies with Section 1320. For purposes of that Act, the General Assembly finds that 14the adoption of rules to implement this Act is deemed an 15emergency and necessary for the public interest, safety, and 16welfare. 17    Section 40. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 18amended by adding Section 5-45.65 as follows: 19    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.65 new)20    Sec. 5-45.65. Emergency rulemaking; State Board of 21Education. To provide for the expeditious and timely 22implementation of the Let America Read Act, emergency rules 23implementing the Let America Read Act may be adopted in   SB2124- 9 -LRB104 09790 LNS 19856 b1accordance with Section 5-45 by the State Board of Education. 2The adoption of emergency rules authorized by Section 5-45 and 3this Section is deemed to be necessary for the public 4interest, safety, and welfare.5    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 6of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.